South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S606.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-6-240 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) An individual with an expired license who, at the time of expiration, was in good standing, has twenty-five years or more of licensure in South Carolina, and who is sixty-five years of age, may apply to the Auctioneers' Commission for a renewal of the expired license. The applicant must pay the renewal fee as provided by law. Upon renewal, the licensee is exempt from continuing education requirements as provided by law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----